tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları > Alet Saklama ve Düzenleme > Bahçe Hortumu Saklama Kutuları: Hortum Askıları; Hortum Kapları; Hortum Makaraları
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo > Shranjevanje in organizacija orodja > Shranjevanje vrtnih cevi: Obešalniki za cevi; Posode za cevi; Koluti za cevi
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror > Förvaring och organisering av verktyg > Vattenslangsförvaring: Slanghängare; Slangkrukor; Slangrullar
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai > Įrankių saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Sodo žarnų saugojimas: Žarnų pakabos; Žarnų puodai; Žarnų ritės
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci > Skladištenje i organizacija alata > Skladištenje vrtnih crijeva: Vješalice za crijeva; Posude za crijeva; Koluti za namatanje crijeva
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell > Oppbevaring og organisering av verktøy > Lagring av hageslanger: Slangehengere; Slangepotter; Slangeruller
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők > Szerszámtároló és -szervező > Kertitömlő-tároló: Tömlőakasztók; Tömlőedények; Tömlőtekercsek
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör > Werkzeugaufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme > Gartenschlauchhalterungen: Schlauchaufhänger; Schlauchtöpfe; Schlauchtrommeln
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag > Gereedschapopslag en -indeling > Tuinslang opbergen: Slanghangers; Slangpotten; Slanghaspels
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件 > 工具存储与收纳 > 橡胶软管存储盒: 软管挂钩; 软管罐; 软管卷筒
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie > Depozitarea și organizarea sculelor > Depozitare furtun de grădină: Dispozitive de agățare pentru furtun; Recipiente pentru furtun; Tamburi pentru furtun
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet > Työkalujen säilytys > Puutarhaletkun säilytys: Letkuripustimet; Letkuastiat; Letkukelat
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類 > 工具保管用品 > ホース保管用品: ホースハンガー; ホースポット; ホースリール
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари > Съхранение и организация на инструменти > Съхранение на градински маркуч: Закачалки за маркучи; Гърнета за маркучи; Макари за маркучи
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens > Porta-ferramentas > Suporte para mangueiras de jardim: Penduradores de mangueira; Vasos para mangueiras; Carretéis para mangueira
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий > Хранение инструментов > Хранение садовых шлангов: Кронштейны-подвесы для шлангов; Горшки для шлангов; Катушки для шлангов
zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件 > 工具收納 > 花園澆水管收納用品: 澆水管吊架; 澆水管罐; 澆水管轉盤
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng > Cất giữ và sắp xếp dụng cụ > Thiết bị cuộn ống nước làm vườn: Móc treo ống; Chậu vòi; Cuộn ống
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta > Conservazione/ordine attrezzi > Portacanna dell'acqua: Ganci per tubi; Vasi per tubi flessibili; Avvolgitubo
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์ > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบเครื่องมือ > ที่เก็บสายยาง: ที่แขวนสายยาง; โอ่งเก็บสายยาง; ที่ม้วนสายยาง
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie > Organisation et rangement d’outils > Porte-tuyau d’arrosage: Cintres de tuyaux; Pots de tuyau; Enrouleurs de tuyaux
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu > Przechowywanie i porządkowanie narzędzi > Przechowywanie węży ogrodowych: Wieszaki na węże; Pojemniki na węże; Bębny na węże
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje > Organización y almacenamiento de herramientas > Soporte de manguera de jardín: Colgadores de manguera; Macetas de manguera; Carretes de manguera
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품 > 공구 수납/정리 > 정원용 호스 보관 용품: 호스 걸이; 호스 보관함; 호스 릴
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento > Armazenamento e organização de ferramentas > Armazenamento de mangueira de jardim: Cabides para mangueiras; Potes para mangueiras; Carretos para mangueiras
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu > Uskladnenie a organizácia nástrojov > Stojan na záhradnú hadicu: Háčiky na hadice; Bubny na hadice; Navijaky na hadice
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση εργαλείων > Αποθήκευση σωλήνα κήπου: Κρεμάστρες σωλήνων; Δοχεία αποθήκευσης σωλήνων κήπου; Καρούλια σωλήνα
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství > Ukládání a organizace nářadí > Držáky zahradních hadic: Držáky hadic; Nádoby na hadice; Hadicové bubny
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør > Værktøjsopbevaring og -organisering > Opbevaring af haveslanger: Slangebøjler; Slangepotter; Slangeruller
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories > Tool Storage & Organization > Garden Hose Storage: Hose Hangers; Hose Pots; Hose Reels